District of Columbia statutes.
9-322

Highway grade crossing at Michigan Avenue closed.

From and after the completion of the said viaduct and approaches, the highway grade crossing over the tracks and the right-of-way of the said Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company at Michigan Avenue in the District of Columbia shall be forever closed against further traffic of any kind.

History

Mar. 3, 1927, 44 Stat. 1352, ch. 305, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-522.
1973 Ed., § 7-522.